Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,232
Civil action; restriction.

No action may be commenced under section 81-15,230 against an owner or operator of a facility if the administrator has commenced and is diligently pursuing an administrative order or civil action to enforce the requirement concerned or to impose a civil penalty under Title III with respect to the violation of the requirement.

Laws 1997, LB 374, § 42.